Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 18.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-165
Security interest
in all-terrain vehicle, minibike, or utility-type vehicle; perfection; priority;
notation of lien; when.

(1) Any security interest
in an all-terrain vehicle or minibike perfected pursuant to article 9, Uniform
Commercial Code, before, on, or after January 1, 2004, or in a utility-type vehicle so perfected before, on, or
after January 1, 2011, shall continue to be perfected until (a)
the financing statement perfecting such security interest is terminated or
lapses in the absence of the filing of a continuation statement pursuant to
article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, or (b) an all-terrain vehicle, utility-type vehicle, or
minibike certificate of title is issued and a notation of lien is made as
provided in section 60-164.

(2) Any lien noted on the face of an all-terrain vehicle, utility-type vehicle, or
minibike certificate of title or on an electronic certificate of title record
pursuant to subsection (1), (3), or (4) of this section, on behalf of the
holder of a security interest in the all-terrain vehicle, utility-type vehicle, or minibike which was
previously perfected pursuant to article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, shall
have priority as of the date such security interest was originally perfected.

(3) The holder of a certificate of title for an all-terrain
vehicle, utility-type vehicle, or
minibike shall, upon request, surrender the certificate of title to a holder
of a previously perfected security interest in the all-terrain vehicle, utility-type vehicle, or
minibike to permit notation of a lien on the certificate of title or on an
electronic certificate of title record and shall do such other acts as may
be required to permit such notation.

(4) If the owner of an all-terrain vehicle or minibike subject
to a security interest perfected pursuant to article 9, Uniform Commercial
Code, fails or refuses to obtain a certificate of title after January 1, 2004,
the security interest holder may obtain a certificate of title in the name
of the owner of the all-terrain vehicle or minibike following the procedures
of section 60-144 and may have a lien noted on the certificate of title or
on an electronic certificate of title record pursuant to section 60-164.

(5) If the
owner of a utility-type vehicle subject to a security interest perfected pursuant
to article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, fails or refuses to obtain a certificate
of title after January 1, 2011, the security interest holder may obtain a
certificate of title in the name of the owner of the utility-type vehicle
following the procedures of section 60-144 and may have a lien noted on the
certificate of title or on an electronic certificate of title record pursuant
to section 60-164.

(6) The
assignment, release, or satisfaction of a security interest in an all-terrain
vehicle, utility-type vehicle, or
minibike shall be governed by the laws under which it was perfected.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 65;

Laws 2009, LB202, § 16;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 18.